District of Columbia statutes.
6-301.06

Repealed

Transfer, lease, or sale of real property for public and private uses.

Repealed.

Aug. 2, 1946, 60 Stat. 795, ch. 736, § 7
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(a), (b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
Aug. 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 1103, Pub. L. 85-854, § 1(4-11)
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(19)
Oct. 14, 1972, 86 Stat. 812, Pub. L. 92-495, § 3
Aug. 17, 1982, D.C. Law 4-140, § 2(b), 29 DCR 2862
Aug. 1, 1985, D.C. Law 6-15, § 4, 32 DCR 3570
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-226, § 2, 48 DCR 1603
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 232(e), 50 DCR 5668
1981 Ed., § 5-806.
1973 Ed., § 5-706.
D.C. Law 13-226 added subsecs. (c-2) and (c-3).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Redevelopment Land Agency Disposition Review Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-44, October 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 8864).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Exclusive Right Agreement Time Period Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-295, April 11, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 5853).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Redevelopment Land Agency Disposition Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-108, July 9, 1999, 46 DCR 6034).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Redevelopment Land Agency Disposition Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-431, August 14, 2000, 47 DCR 7462).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2 and 6(a) of the Redevelopment Land Agency Disposition Review Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-524, January 11, 2001, 48 DCR 624).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Exclusive Right Agreement Time Period Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-537, December 2, 2002, 49 DCR 11650).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Exclusive Right Agreement Time Period Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-23, February 25, 2003, 50 DCR 2139).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 232(e) of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).

Resolution 14-72, the “Request for Proposals for the Redevelopment of Parcel One in the Downtown Urban Renewal Area, Site of the Old Wax Museum, Lot 158 in Square 515 Approval Resolution of 2001”, was approved effective April 3, 2001.

Resolution 14-153, the “Acceptance of the Unsolicited Proposal Submitted by Duron Paint and Wallcovering for the Acquisition and Development of Parcel 11 in the Fourteenth Street Urban Renewal Area Approval Resolution of 2001”, was approved effective July 10, 2001.

Resolution 14-187, the Unsolicited Proposal Submitted by DNC Non-federal Programs, Inc. for the Negotiated Disposition and Development of Parcel 69 in the Southwest Urban Renewal Area Emergency Approval Resolution of 2001, was approved effective July 10, 2001.

Offering document: Pursuant to Resolution 5-765, the “Offering Document to Receive Proposals to Develop Parcels 7, 18, 19, 21, and 22 in the H Street Urban Renewal Area Approval Resolution of 1984,” effective June 26, 1984, the Council approved the issuance of an offering document to develop Parcels 7, 18, 19, 21, and 22 in the H Street Urban Renewal Area.

Pursuant to Resolution 7-308, the “Public Offering Document to Receive Proposals to Develop Parcel 1 in the Downtown Urban Renewal Area Disapproval Resolution of 1988”, effective July 12, 1988, the Council disapproved the issuance of an offering document to develop Parcel 1 in the Downtown Urban Renewal Area.

Review of unsolicited offer to develop parcel in Southwest Urban Renewal Area, Project C: Pursuant to Resolution 5-891, the “Unsolicited Offer to Develop Parcel 57-2 in the Southwest Urban Renewal Area, Project C Review Resolution of 1984,” effective October 23, 1984, the Council reviewed and commented on the unsolicited offer to develop Parcel 57-2 in the Southwest Urban Renewal Area, Project C, pursuant to § 7(e)(2) of the District of Columbia Redevelopment Act of 1945, effective August 17, 1982 (D.C. Law 4-140; D.C. Code, § 6-301.06(c)(2)).

Unsolicited Proposal to Acquire and Develop Parcels 12, 13, 23-A and 34 in the 14th Street Urban Renewal Area Emergency Approval Resolution of 1992: Pursuant to Resolution 9-289, effective July 7, 1992, the Council approved, on an emergency basis, acceptance of an unsolicited proposal to acquire and develop parcels 12, 13, 23-A and 34 in the 14th Street Urban Renewal Area.

Unsolicited Proposal to Lease and Develop Parcel 6, Square 455, in the Downtown Urban Renewal Area Resolution of 1995: Pursuant to Resolution 11-25, effective February 7, 1995, the Council reviewed and provided comments on an Unsolicited Proposal to Lease and Develop Parcel 6, Square 455, in the Downtown Urban Renewal Area.

Unsolicited Proposal Submitted by BUDCO Construction, Inc. for the Negotiated Disposition of Square 5252, Lots 142, 143, 144 and 145 Resolution of 1994: Pursuant to Proposed Resolution 11-19, deemed approved February 24, 1995, Council reviewed and had no comments on an Unsolicited Proposal submitted by BUDCO Construction, Inc. for the negotiated disposition of Square 5252, Lots 142, 143, 144 and 145 which are located between 54th, Blaine and Dix Streets.

Unsolicited Proposal Submitted by the Camp Simms Limited Partnership for the Negotiated Disposition of Camp Simms Resolution of 1994: Pursuant to Proposed Resolution 11-26, deemed approved May 3, 1995, Council reviewed and provided no comment on an Unsolicited Proposal submitted by the Camp Simms Limited Partnership for the negotiated disposition of Camp Simms.

Unsolicited Proposal Submitted by AMB Enterprises, Inc. for the Negotiated Disposition of the former Thompson’s Dairy Site: Pursuant to Proposed Resolution 11-27, deemed approved May 3, 1995, Council reviewed and provided no comment on an Unsolicited Proposal submitted by AMB Enterprises, Inc. for the negotiated disposition of the former Thompson’s Dairy site.

Unsolicited Proposal to Acquire 2250 12th Place, N.W., Approval Resolution of 1994: Pursuant to Proposed Resolution 11-39, deemed approved June 24, 1995, Council reviewed and approved a development proposal to acquire and develop 2250 12th Place, N.W.

Unsolicited Proposal Submitted by The Washington Development Group, Inc. for the Negotiated Disposition and Development of Parcel 51-B in the Northwest Number One Urban Renewal Area Resolution of 1995: Pursuant to Proposed Resolution 11-226, deemed approved November 2, 1995, Council reviewed and had no comment on an Unsolicited Proposal submitted by the Washington Development Group, Inc. for the negotiated disposition and development of Parcel 51-B in the Northwest Number One Urban Renewal Area.

Prospectus for Redevelopment Land Agency Parcels 45 and 47A Resolution of 1997: Proposed Resolution 12-0116, the “Prospectus for Redevelopment Land Agency Parcels 45 and 47A Resolution of 1997” was deemed approved, effective Jan. 14, 1997.

Unsolicited Proposals for the Acquisition and Development of Parcel 51 Emergency Approval Resolution of 1998: Pursuant to Resolution 12-618, effective July 7, 1998, the Council expressed its intent to review and provide comments, on an emergency basis, on an unsolicited proposal submitted by 400 Twelfth Street, L.L.C., for the acquisition and development of Parcel 51 (400 12th Street, S.W.).

Unsolicited Proposal Submitted by Challenger Court, Inc., for the Acquisition and Development of the Remainder of Parcel 76 in the Former Southwest “C” Urban Renewal Area Resolution of 1998: Pursuant to Resolution PR 12-1009, deemed approved on November 15, 1998, the Council reviewed and had no comment on the acceptance by the Board of Directors of the District of Columbia Redevelopment Land Agency of the Unsolicited Proposal submitted by Challenger Court, Inc., for the acquisition and development of the remainder of Parcel 76, (G and 9th Streets, S.W.), in the former southwest “C” Urban Renewal Area.

Subsection (c-1) of this section is reserved because the Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority rejected the act that created (c-1).